src/fst/affixes/regular_declinations.lexc
LEXICON STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL    ! genitive and cases depending on it (either sg or pl)
                              ! incl. sse-illative 
              : GENITIVE ; 
              : ALL_SEM_CASES ;

LEXICON ALL_SEM_CASES       ! semantic cases, incl sse-illative

              : LOCATIVES_PLUS ;
              : NINATAGA ;

LEXICON NINATAGA

              :%>ni TERMINATIVE ;	
              :%>na ESSIVE ;	
              :%>ta ABESSIVE ;	
              :%>ga COMITATIVE ;

	
LEXICON N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA    ! pl cases depending on vowel plural gen  
                              ! incl. ni-na-ta-ga
           +Pl: ALL_SEM_CASES ;

LEXICON LOCATIVES_PLUS            

              : LOCATIVES ;
              :%>ks TRANSLATIVE ;

LEXICON LOCATIVES            

              :%>sse ILLATIVE ;
              : REGULAR_LOCATIVES ;

LEXICON REGULAR_LOCATIVES            

              :%>s INESSIVE ;
              :%>st ELATIVE ;
              :%>le ALLATIVE ;	
              :%>l ADESSIVE ;	
              :%>lt ABLATIVE ;	

! -----------
! individual cases
! -----------

! the preferred form for Pl Par and Sg Ill is indicated in the stem lexicon
! (not in the continuation lexicon)
! so these variants allow us to carry the info from stem lex to the final surface form

LEXICON PL_PAR_VARIANT    ! for TAUD, PIIM, KOON etc types

     +Usage/Rare:%{rare.pl.partitive%} PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! less used pl par form for that word
              : PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! default pl par form for that word

LEXICON SG_ILL_VARIANT    ! for KEEL etc types

     +Usage/Rare:%>%{ss%}%{ss%}%{e%}%{rare.illative%} SG_ILLATIVE ;  ! less used sg ill form for that word
              :%>%{ss%}%{ss%}%{e%} SG_ILLATIVE ;          ! default sg ill form for that word

! -------- these cases are (often) non-predictable from Sg Nom

LEXICON SG_NOMINATIVE
           +Sg:%{no.apo%} NOMINATIVE ;
              : LANE_DERIVATION ;
              : IST_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON SG_GENITIVE
           +Sg: GENITIVE ;
              : KE_DERIVATION ;
              : LINE_DERIVATION ;
              : M_DERIVATION ;
              : LT_DERIVATION ;
              : STI_DERIVATION ;
              : INI_DERIVATION ;
              : TI_DERIVATION ;
              : NNA_DERIVATION ;
              : KAS_DERIVATION ;
              : NE_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON SG_PARTITIVE
           +Sg: PARTITIVE ;

LEXICON SG_ILLATIVE
           +Sg: ILLATIVE ;

LEXICON PL_PARTITIVE
           +Pl: PARTITIVE ;

! --------- the 14 individual cases ------------
!! flag diacritics can be used for remembering the case 

LEXICON NOMINATIVE
          +Nom: NOM_GI ;

LEXICON GENITIVE
          +Gen: GEN_GI ;

LEXICON PARTITIVE
          +Par: PAR_GI ;	

LEXICON ILLATIVE
          +Ill: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON INESSIVE
          +Ine: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON ELATIVE
          +Ela: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON ALLATIVE
          +All: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON ADESSIVE
          +Ade: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON ABLATIVE
          +Abl: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON TRANSLATIVE
          +Tra: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON TERMINATIVE
          +Trm: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON ESSIVE
          +Ess: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON ABESSIVE
          +Abe: SEM_GI ;	

LEXICON COMITATIVE
          +Com: SEM_GI ;	

!! flag diacritics are used for remembering the case for compounding; 
!! not all the cases must be distinguished

LEXICON NOM_GI
  @P.Case.Nom@ GI ;

LEXICON GEN_GI
  @P.Case.Gen@ GI ;

LEXICON PAR_GI
  @P.Case.Par@ GI ;

LEXICON SEM_GI     ! semantic (aka oblique) case
  @P.Case.Sem@ GI ;

LEXICON PL_NOM_GI       ! in compounding, +Pl is relevant for +Nom only
  @P.Case.PlNom@ GI ;

! paradigmatic derivation, i.e. very regular

LEXICON M_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.m@ M_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON M_DERIVATION_SUF
          +Der/m+A+Comp:»m MAGUS ;           ! suurem, elanum,  etc

LEXICON IM_DERIVATION
   @P.Der.im@ IM_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON IM_DERIVATION_SUF
      +Der/im+A+Superl:m MAGUS ;         ! suurim, elanuim, õnnelikem etc; NB! notice that » is missing!
!       +Der/im+A+Superl:m LT_DERIVATION ; ! suurimalt, elanuimalt, õnnelikemalt

LEXICON NNA_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.N@ NNA_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON NNA_DERIVATION_SUF
            +Der/nna+N:»nna PERE ;             ! õpetajanna

LEXICON LANE_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.N@@C.NeedNoun@ LANE_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON LANE_DERIVATION_SUF
@U.Cap.Opt@@C.Cap@ LANE_DERIVATION_CAP ;         ! proper name must be downcased 

LEXICON LANE_DERIVATION_CAP
            +Der/lane+N:»lane OLULINE ;          ! helveetslane etc

LEXICON LIK_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.A@@C.NeedAdj@ LIK_DERIVATION_SUF ; ! the compounding algorithm needs a noun to be derived into adj,
                                            ! and this suffix satisfies its expectation

LEXICON LIK_DERIVATION_SUF
@U.Cap.Opt@@C.Cap@ LIK_DERIVATION_CAP ;         ! proper name must be downcased

LEXICON LIK_DERIVATION_CAP
            +Der/lik+A:»l˘ik ELANIK ;           ! elajalik etc
            +Der/lik+A:»l˘ikk US_DERIVATION ;  ! elajalikkus etc

LEXICON LINE_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.A@@C.NeedAdj@ LINE_DERI ;          ! the compounding algorithm needs a noun to be derived into adj,
                                            ! and this suffix satisfies its expectation
LEXICON LINE_DERI
  @D.POS.NProp@ LINE_DERIVATION_SUF ;       ! ordinary derivation
  @R.POS.NProp@@R.Stem.üle@@P.Part.Bad@@U.Cap.Opt@@C.Cap@ LINE_DERIVATION_SUF ;  ! üle + Siberi +Der/line; downcase and finish

LEXICON LINE_DERIVATION_SUF
            +Der/line+A:»line OLULINE ;          ! põõsaline etc

LEXICON KOND_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.N@ KOND_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON KOND_DERIVATION_SUF
           +Der/kond+N:»k˘onD1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;  ! elajaskond etc
           +Der/kond+N:»konni TI_DERIVATION ;     ! elanikkonniti

LEXICON US_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.us@@C.NeedNoun@ US_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON US_DERIVATION_SUF
             +Der/us+N:»us OLULINE ;         ! elajalikkus, elavus, ...

LEXICON IST_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.ist@ IST_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON IST_DERIVATION_SUF
             +Der/ist+N:»ist TAUD ;         ! kapitalist

LEXICON LT_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.Adv@ LT_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON LT_DERIVATION_SUF
            +Der/lt+Adv:»lt GI ;         ! derivation: suurelt, elanult, ...

LEXICON STI_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.Adv@ STI_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON STI_DERIVATION_SUF
          +Der/sti+Adv:»sti GI ;        ! valusasti, kuuldavasti

LEXICON INI_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.Adv@ INI_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON INI_DERIVATION_SUF
          +Der/ini+Adv:»ini GI ;        ! valusamini

LEXICON TI_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.Adv@ TI_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON TI_DERIVATION_SUF
           +Der/ti+Adv:»ti GI ;        ! maakonniti

LEXICON KE_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.N@ KE_DERIVATION_SUF ;    ! P.Der.N is not correct always

LEXICON KE_DERIVATION_SUF
               +Dim/ke:»ke PEENIKE ;         ! suureke, majake, õpetajannake, ...

LEXICON SHORT_NE_STEM
    @P.Case.Short@ SHORT_NE_STEM_SUF ;

LEXICON SHORT_NE_STEM_SUF
            +Der/minus:»- # ;                ! vaatamis-, astraal-

LEXICON KAS_DERIVATION
  @P.Der.kas@@C.NeedNoun@ KAS_DERIVATION_SUF ;    

LEXICON KAS_DERIVATION_SUF
            +Der/kas+N:»ka LOHAKAS ;         ! kolmekas

LEXICON NE_DERIVATION                        ! last part, currently only in compounds after POS.Num 
  @P.Der.A@@R.NeedDerNe@@C.NeedDerNe@ NE_DERIVATION_SUF ;    

LEXICON NE_DERIVATION_SUF
            +Der/ne+A:»ne SOOLANE ;         ! 5-autone

! ----------------------
! for tokenization with hfst-tokenize
! copied from lang-sme

LEXICON DOT   !!= * **@CODE@** - number ending with a dot may be ordinal, or ordinal/cardinal followed by a full stop

         +Use/-PMatch:%. # ; ! We need the dot here for regular fsts

! Split the number + full stop in two segments, but only when using pmatch: +Num+Ord +CLB
 < "@P.Pmatch.Loc@" {.} "+CLB":0 "+Use/PMatch":0 > # ;

! Make a regular number analysis AND backtrack to find alternative analyses: +Num+Ord; +Num+Card +CLB 
 < "+Use/PMatch":0 "@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@" [0:%.] > # ;


! Gives:
!$ echo '1.' \
!| hfst-tokenise -g tools/tokenisers/tokeniser-gramcheck-gt-desc.pmhfst 
! "<1.>"
!	"." CLB <W:0.0> "<.>"
!		"1" Num Ord <W:0.0> "<1>"
!	"1" Num Ord <W:0.0>
!	"." CLB <W:0.0> "<.>"
!		"1" Num Card <W:0.0> "<1>"
!:\n
!
! which is exactly what we want.


LEXICON DOTABBR
         +Use/-PMatch:%. # ; ! We need the dot here for regular fsts
! This one should create a new backtrack-point before the dot, but *no* sub-reading:
< "+Use/PMatch":0 "@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@" "@P.Pmatch.Loc@" 0:"." > # ;

! Gives:
!$ echo 'pst.' \
!| hfst-tokenise -g tools/tokenisers/tokeniser-gramcheck-gt-desc.pmhfst 
!"<pst.>"
!	"pst" ABBR <W:0.0>
!	"." CLB <W:0.0> "<.>"
!		"pst" Interj <W:11.0> "<pst>"
!	"." CLB <W:0.0> "<.>"
!		"pst" ABBR <W:0.0> "<pst>"
!:\n 
